Hawaii, session 2026, HB792.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 21F-6, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended to read as follows: "[[]§21F-6[]]  Office of the legislative analyst established.  (a)  There is established the office of the legislative analyst to be administered by the committee.  The committee shall appoint a legislative analyst who shall serve for a [period] term of four years.  The committee[, by a three-fourths vote of its members,] may remove the legislative analyst from office[,] by a three-fourths vote of its members, but only for cause.  The committee shall fix the salary of the legislative analyst. (b)  The legislative analyst may employ other clerical and technical employees as may be necessary to carry out the functions of the office.  The legislative analyst and other clerical and technical employees [shall be entitled to] may participate in any employee benefit program plan or privilege generally available to state employees." SECTION 2.  Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3.  This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________